Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB636.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail of products or services for a guide dog, hearing dog or service dog. The following apply:(i) The sale or use under this clause must involve a 12345678910111213141516171819202122 transaction with:(A) an individual with a disability or a person acting on behalf of an individual with a disability; or(B) a person caring for the guide dog, hearing dog or service dog.(ii) The products or services for a guide dog, hearing dog or service dog under this clause shall include the following:(A) Veterinary services and diagnostic procedures.(B) Prescription and nonprescription drugs and pharmaceuticals.(C) Items involving feed and care, including:(I) Beds, linens, blankets and pillows specifically designed and manufactured for use by a dog.(II) Dog collars and leads.(III) Dog harnesses.(IV) Dog waste disposal supplies and equipment.(V) Grooming articles specifically designed for use on domestic dogs.(VI) Flea and tick medications.(VII) Travel kennels or cages.(VIII) Dog food, including treats.(IX) Vitamin supplements.(D) Services involving maintenance and care, including:(I) Boarding services.(II) Dental services.(III) Grooming services.(iii) The department shall develop any necessary forms, to be provided to the department by a seller or provider of products or services under this clause, verifying that the sale or use of the products or services involves:20250SB0636PN0641 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) A guide dog, hearing dog or service dog.(B) Either of the following:(I) An individual with a disability or a person acting on behalf of an individual with a disability.(II) A person caring for the guide dog, hearing dog or service dog.(iv) For the purposes of this clause, the following terms or phrases shall have the following meanings:(A) "Guide dog" means a dog that is trained and used to aid an individual who is blind or visually impaired. The term includes a dog that is in training to become a guide dog.(B) "Hearing dog" means a dog that is trained and used to aid an individual who is deaf or hearing impaired. The term includes a dog that is in training to become a hearing dog.(C) "Individual with a disability" means an individual who has a physical or medical impairment resulting from an anatomical, physiological or neurological condition that prevents the exercise of a normal bodily function or that is demonstrable by medically accepted clinical or laboratory diagnostic techniques.(D) "Service dog" means a dog that is trained and used to aid an individual who has a physical impairment that is permanent and severely limits the mobility of the individual, or who is unable to move about without the use of a wheelchair or without the aid of a prosthetic device. The term includes a dog that is in training to become a service dog.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0636PN0641 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627